src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
## Verb inflection proper


### Present vowel stems

* *kutoa:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # knit)
* *kudon:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`

* *yltää:* `yltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # reach)
* *yllän:* `yltää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1`

The strong form of present indicative endings in strong stems and ma 
infinitive, and maisilla derivation (nee infinitive).

*Verb strong present back examples:*
* *kutovat:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3`
* *kutomatta:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfMa+Sg+Abe`


*Verb strong present front examples:*
* *yltävät:* `yltää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3`
* *yltämättä:* `yltää+V+Act+InfMa+Sg+Abe`

### Verb 3rd singular forms
The third singular form of present tense has few allomorphs according to
preceding vowel context, either lengthening or zero after long vowel stem:


*Verb 3rd singular a examples:*
* *rakentaa:* `rakentaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # builds)


*Verb 3rd singular e back examples:*
* *tulee:* `tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # comes)


*Verb 3rd singular e front examples:*
* *menee:* `mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # goes)


*Verb 3rd singular i back examples:*
* *munii:* `munia+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # lays eggs)


*Verb 3rd singular e front examples:*
* *rämpii:* `rämpiä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # hikes)


*Verb 3rd singular o back examples:*
* *kutoo:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3`


*Verb 3rd singular u back examples:*
* *viruu:* `virua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # stretches)


*Verb 3rd singular y examples:*
* *kääntyy:* `kääntyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # turns)


*Verb 3rd singular ö examples:*
* *säilöö:* `säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # conserves)


*Verb 3rd singular ä examples:*
* *vääntää:* `vääntää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3` (Eng. # twist)

### Past forms


*Verb past back examples:*
* *kudoin:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`


*Verb past front examples:*
* *ylsin:* `yltää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1`


*Verb past back strong examples:*
* *kutoivat:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3`


*Verb past front strong examples:*
* *ylsivät:* `yltää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3`

### Imperatives


*Verb imperative back examples:*
* *kutokaa:* `kutoa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2`


*Verb imperative front examples:*
* *yltäkää:* `yltää+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2`

### Conditionals


*Verb conditional back examples:*
* *kutoisin:* `kutoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1`


*Verb conditional front examples:*
* *yltäisin:* `yltää+V+Act+Cond+Sg1`

### Potentials


*Verb potential n back examples:*
* *kutonen:* `kutoa+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`


*Verb potential n front examples:*
* *yltänen:* `yltää+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`


*Verb potential s back examples:*
* *juossen:* `juosta+V+Act+Pot+Sg1` (Eng. # I might run)


*Verb potential s front examples:*
* *päässen:* `päästä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1` (Eng. # I might be able to)


*Verb potential l back examples:*
* *tullen:* `tulla+V+Act+Pot+Sg1`


*Verb potential l front examples:*
* *kävellen:* `kävellä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1` (Eng. # I might walk)


*Verb potential r back examples:*
* *surren:* `surra+V+Act+Pot+Sg1` (Eng. # I might be sad)


*Verb potential r front examples:*
* *pierren:* `pierrä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1` (Eng. # I might fart)

## Passive forms
The passive forms usually contain -ta-, -tä-, -da-, -dä-, element in them.
The variation between the realisations is one key factor of determining the
classification of the verb roots.


*Verb passive back examples:*
* *kudottiin:* `kutoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`
* *juostiin:* `juosta+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`


*Verb passive front examples:*
* *nähtiin:* `nähdä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4`


The form of present passive assimilates leftwards, varying between
-ta, -tä, -da, -dä, -la, -lä, -ra, -rä, -na, -nä.


*Verb passive back t examples:*
* *juostaan:* `juosta+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`


*Verb passive front t examples:*
* *ylletään:* `yltää+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`


*Verb passive back d examples:*
* *kopioidaan:* `kopioida+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4` (Eng. # copy-passive)


*Verb passive front d examples:*
* *nähdään:* `nähdä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`


*Verb passive back l examples:*
* *vuollaan:* `vuolla+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4` (Eng. # carve wood-passive)


*Verb passive front l examples:*
* *niellään:* `niellä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4` (Eng. # swallow-passive)


*Verb passive back r examples:*
* *surraan:* `surra+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4` (Eng. # sorrow-passive)


*Verb passive front r examples:*
* *pierrään:* `pierrä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4` (Eng. # fart-passive)


*Verb passive back n examples:*
* *pannaan:* `panna+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4` (Eng. # put-passive)


*Verb passive front n examples:*
* *mennään:* `mennä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4`


## Infinite verb forms


*Verb a infinitive examples:*
* *juoda:* `juoda+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # drink)


*Verb ä infinitive examples:*
* *nähdä:* `nähdä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat`


*Verb E infinitive back examples:*
* *kutoessa:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`


*Verb E infinitive front examples:*
* *yltäessä:* `yltää+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine`

### Participles


*Verb nut participle passive tu examples:*
* *valkaistu:* `valkaista+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bleached)


*Verb nut participle passive ty examples:*
* *häpäisty:* `häpäistä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sacrileged)


*Verb nut participle passive tu~u examples:*
* *huudettu:* `huutaa+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # yelled)


*Verb nut participle passive ty~y examples:*
* *ylennetty:* `ylentää+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # promoted)


*Verb nut participle passive tu~du examples:*
* *viipaloitu:* `viipaloida+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sliced)


*Verb nut participle passive ty~dy examples:*
* *yksilöity:* `yksilöidä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # singled out)


*Verb nut participle passive tu~lu examples:*
* *paranneltu:* `parannella+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # embettered)


*Verb nut participle passive ty~ly examples:*
* *vähätelty:* `vähätellä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # belittled)


*Verb nut participle passive tu~nu examples:*
* *pantu:* `panna+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # put)


*Verb nut participle passive ty~ny examples:*
* *menty:* `mennä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # went)


*Verb nut participle passive tu~ru examples:*
* *purtu:* `purra+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # bitten)


*Verb nut participle passive ty~ry examples:*
* *pierty:* `pierrä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom`

### Possessives for infinite verb forms

*Verb possessive front examples:*
* *kutoakseni:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Tra+PxSg1`
* *kutoessasi:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine+PxSg2`


*Verb possessive back examples:*
* *nähdäkseni:* `nähdä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Tra+PxSg1`
* *nähdessäsi:* `nähdä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine+PxSg2`


*Verb possessive back an examples:*
* *kutomattaan:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfMa+Sg+Abe+PxSg3`


*Verb possessive back en examples:*
* *kutoakseen:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Tra+PxPl3`


*Verb possessive front en examples:*
* *nähdäkseen:* `nähdä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Tra+PxPl3`


*Verb possessive back än examples:*
* *näkemättään:* `nähdä+V+Act+InfMa+Sg+Abe+PxSg3`

### Verb clitics


*Verbs clitic back examples:*
* *kudonhan:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Foc/han`
* *kudotko:* `kutoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Qst`


*Verbs clitic front examples:*
* *näenhän:* `nähdä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Foc/han`
* *näetkö:* `nähdä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Qst`











## Deverbal derivations
Part of the deverbal derivation system in Finnish is so regular that it has
been included as part of inflectional morphology in many traditional systems.
These derivations are treated as inflection in our system as well.

### -minen, "Fourth infinitive"



### Participles


*Verbs participle back examples:*
* *kutomani:* `kutoa+V+AgPrc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`
* *kutomaton:* `kutoa+V+NegPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *kutova:* `kutoa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom`


*Verbs participle front examples:*
* *näkemäni:* `nähdä+V+AgPrc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`
* *näkemätön:* `nähdä+V+NegPrc+Sg+Nom`
* *näkevä:* `nähdä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom`


















































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
